Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1330
Elected officials
and employees having regular term; act, when operative.

The provisions of the
State Employees Retirement Act pertaining to elected officials
or other employees having a regular term of office shall be interpreted as
to effectuate its general purpose and to take effect as soon as the same may
become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 30, p. 1677;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 17.